Colorado, session 2026A, SB027.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Colorado:
SECTION 1. Short title. The short title of this act is the "Parental
Equality and Child Empowerment Act" or "PEACE Act".
SECTION 2. Legislative declaration. (1) The general assembly
finds and declares that:
(a) The policy of the state promotes the best interests of the child
by encouraging frequent, meaningful, and continuing contact with both
parents following a separation or divorce;
(b) Children benefit emotionally, psychologically, and
academically and are empowered overall by shared parenting
arrangements;
(c) A rebuttable presumption of equal parenting time promotes
fairness, reduces litigation, and protects the constitutional rights of
parents and children; and
(d) Courts must retain discretion to protect children in exceptional
circumstances. However, that discretion must be exercised with written
findings to ensure transparency and consistency.
SECTION 3. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 14-10-124, amend
(1.5)(a) introductory portion; and add (1.3)(b.5) and (1.5)(a.3) as follows:
14-10-124. Best interests of the child - definitions.
(1.3) Definitions. For purposes of this section and section
14-10-129 (2)(c), unless the context otherwise requires:
(b.5) "EQUAL PARENTING TIME" MEANS A SUBSTANTIALLY EQUAL
-2- SB26-027

ANNUAL ALLOCATION OF A CHILD'S OVERNIGHT VISITATIONS AT EACH
PARTY'S RESIDENCE, WITH AT LEAST FORTY-FIVE PERCENT OF THE
OVERNIGHT VISITATIONS AT EACH RESIDENCE, SUBJECT TO REASONABLE
ADJUSTMENTS FOR THE CHILD'S SCHOOL SCHEDULE, HOLIDAYS, OR OTHER
LOGISTICAL CONSIDERATIONS.
(1.5) Allocation of parental responsibilities. The court shall
determine the allocation of parental responsibilities, including parenting
time and decision-making responsibilities, in accordance with the best
interests of the child, giving paramount consideration to the child's safety
and the physical, mental, and emotional conditions and needs of the child
as follows:
(a) Determination of parenting time. The court, upon the motion
of either party or upon its own motion, may make provisions for parenting
time. THERE IS A REBUTTABLE PRESUMPTION DESCRIBED IN SUBSECTION
(1.5)(a.3) OF THIS SECTION THAT THE COURT ALLOCATE EQUAL PARENTING
TIME TO BOTH PARENTS. IF THE PRESUMPTION DESCRIBED IN SUBSECTION
(1.5)(a.3) OF THIS SECTION IS OVERCOME, THEN THE COURT MAY MAKE
PROVISIONS FOR PARENTING TIME that the court finds are in the best
interests of the child, with the child's safety always paramount, unless the
court finds, after a hearing, that parenting time by the party would
endanger the child's physical health or significantly impair the child's
emotional development. In addition to a finding that parenting time would
endanger the child's physical health or significantly impair the child's
emotional development, in any order imposing or continuing a parenting
time restriction, the court shall enumerate the specific factual findings
supporting the restriction, including findings related to domestic violence,
child abuse, and child sexual abuse, and may enumerate the conditions
-3- SB26-027

that the restricted party could fulfill in order to seek modification in the
parenting plan. When a claim of child abuse or neglect, domestic
violence, or sexual assault where there is also a claim that the child was
conceived as a result of the sexual assault has been made to the court, or
the court has reason to believe that a party has committed child abuse or
neglect, domestic violence, or sexual assault where there is also a claim
that the child was conceived as a result of the sexual assault, prior to
determining parenting time, the court shall follow the provisions of
subsection (4) of this section. In determining the best interests of the child
for purposes of parenting time, the court shall consider all relevant
factors, including:
(a.3) (I) WHEN DETERMINING THE ALLOCATION OF PARENTING
TIME PURSUANT TO SUBSECTION (1.5)(a) OF THIS SECTION, THERE IS A
REBUTTABLE PRESUMPTION THAT THE BEST INTERESTS OF THE CHILD
INCLUDE ALLOCATING EQUAL PARENTING TIME TO BOTH PARENTS IF THE
COURT DETERMINES BY CLEAR AND CONVINCING EVIDENCE THAT BOTH
PARENTS RESIDE WITHIN TWENTY-FIVE MILES OF A GEOGRAPHIC LOCATION
THAT THE COURT DETERMINES IS REASONABLE, INCLUDING THE CHILD'S
CHILD CARE PROVIDER, PRESCHOOL, SCHOOL, THE LOCATION WHERE THE
CHILD PARTICIPATES IN THEIR EDUCATIONAL PROGRAM, OR ANOTHER
GEOGRAPHIC LOCATION THAT THE COURT DETERMINES IS REASONABLE.
(II) A PARTY MAY REBUT THE PRESUMPTION DESCRIBED IN
SUBSECTION (1.5)(a.3)(I) OF THIS SECTION BY CLEAR AND CONVINCING
EVIDENCE THAT IT IS NOT IN THE BEST INTERESTS OF THE CHILD TO
ALLOCATE EQUAL PARENTING TIME TO THE PARENTS. THE GROUNDS FOR
REBUTTING THE PRESUMPTION INCLUDE:
(A) A PARTY IS NOT WILLING, ABLE, OR FIT TO EXERCISE EQUAL
-4- SB26-027

PARENTING TIME;
(B) A PARTY WAS FOUND GUILTY OF CHILD ABUSE OR A CRIME FOR
WHICH THE UNDERLYING FACTUAL BASIS HAS BEEN FOUND BY A COURT ON
THE RECORD TO INCLUDE AN ACT OF DOMESTIC VIOLENCE;
(C) A SUBSTANTIATED HISTORY OF PERSONAL SUBSTANCE MISUSE
OR ALCOHOL MISUSE THAT IMPAIRS A PARTY'S PARENTING FITNESS;
(D) A SUBSTANTIATED HISTORY OF A BEHAVIORAL OR MENTAL
HEALTH DISORDER THAT IMPAIRS A PARTY'S PARENTING FITNESS;
(E) A PARTY'S SUBSTANTIATED PATTERN OF BEHAVIOR THAT
DEMONSTRATES A FAILURE OR REFUSAL TO SHARE PARENTAL
RESPONSIBILITIES;
(F) A PARTY'S SUBSTANTIATED PATTERN OF BEHAVIOR THAT
DEMONSTRATES A FAILURE OR REFUSAL TO ENCOURAGE THE CHILD'S
RELATIONSHIP WITH THE OTHER PARTY; OR
(G) SIGNIFICANT GEOGRAPHIC OR LOGISTICAL BARRIERS THAT
INHIBIT EQUAL PARENTING TIME.
(III) WHEN THE COURT MAKES A DETERMINATION CONCERNING A
MOTION TO REBUT THE PRESUMPTION DESCRIBED IN THIS SUBSECTION
(1.5)(a.3), THE COURT SHALL MAKE SPECIFIC, WRITTEN FINDINGS OF FACT
ON THE RECORD CONCERNING ITS DETERMINATION, INCLUDING ANY CLEAR
AND CONVINCING EVIDENCE RELIED UPON IN MAKING THE
DETERMINATION.
(IV) NOTWITHSTANDING SUBSECTIONS (1.5)(a.3)(I) TO
(1.5)(a.3)(III) OF THIS SECTION, IF THE PARTIES AGREE TO PARENTING TIME
PROVISIONS THAT DO NOT CONSTITUTE EQUAL PARENTING TIME, THE
COURT SHALL ALLOCATE PARENTING TIME CONSISTENT WITH THE PARTIES'
AGREEMENT IF THE COURT DETERMINES THAT THE AGREEMENT IS IN THE
-5- SB26-027

BEST INTERESTS OF THE CHILD.
SECTION 4. Applicability. This act applies to all proceedings
filed on or after the effective date of this act and to all pending
proceedings in which a final order has not been entered on or after the
effective date of this act.
SECTION 5. Safety clause. The general assembly finds,
determines, and declares that this act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety or for appropriations for
the support and maintenance of the departments of the state and state
institutions.
-6- SB26-027